New York, session 2025-2026, S341.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 104 of the alcoholic beverage control law is 2 amended by adding a new subdivision 12 to read as follows: 3 12. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no whole- 4 saler shall assess any fee whatsoever upon any New York state licensed 5 retailer in addition to purchase price of alcoholic beverages. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 7 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 8 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 9 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 10 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01439-01-5